North Dakota statutes. TITLE 47 Property
CHAPTER 47-10 Real Property Transfers
47-10-27.
Manufactured homes — Affixation to real property — Conveyance or encumbrance as real property.

For purposes of this section, “manufactured home” means a manufactured home as defined in section 41-09-02. Notwithstanding this definition, for purposes of 11 U.S.C. 1322(b)(2), a manufactured home is deemed real property. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home is permanently affixed if the manufactured home is affixed to real property and connected to residential utilities, such as water, gas, electricity, or sewer or septic service.

To convey or voluntarily encumber a manufactured home as real property, the following conditions must be met:

The manufactured home must be permanently affixed to real property;

The ownership interests in the manufactured home and the real property to which the manufactured home is or will be permanently affixed must be identical, provided, however, that the owner of the manufactured home, if not the owner of the real property, is in possession of the real property under the terms of a lease in recordable form that has a term that continues for at least twenty years after the date of execution and the consent of the lessor of the real property;

The person having an ownership interest in the manufactured home shall execute and record with the recorder of the county in which the real property is located an affidavit of affixation as provided in subsection 3 and satisfies the other applicable requirements of this section; and

Upon receipt of a recorded copy of the affidavit of affixation under subsection 5, a person designated in the affidavit for filing with the department of transportation shall file the recorded copy of the affidavit of affixation with the department of transportation, except that:

In a circumstance described in item 1 of subparagraph a of paragraph 4 of subdivision a of subsection 3, the recorded copy of the affidavit of affixation and the original manufacturer’s certificate of origin, each as recorded in the county in which the real property is located, must be filed with the department of transportation under subsection 1 of section 39-05-35;

In a circumstance described in item 1 of subparagraph b of paragraph 4 of subdivision a of subsection 3, the recorded copy of the affidavit of affixation, as recorded in the county in which the real property is located, and the original certificate of title must be filed with the department of transportation under subsection 2 of section 39-05-35; and

In a circumstance described in item 2 of subparagraph a of paragraph 4 of subdivision a of subsection 3, item 2 of subparagraph b of paragraph 4 of subdivision a of subsection 3, or paragraph 6 of subdivision a of subsection 3, the recorded copy of the affidavit of affixation, as recorded in the county in which the real property is located, and an application for confirmation of conversion must be filed with the department of transportation under subsection 3 of section 39-05-35.

An affidavit of affixation must contain or be accompanied by:

The name of the manufacturer, the make, the model name, the model year, the dimensions, the manufacturer’s serial number of the manufactured home, and whether the manufactured home is new or used;

A statement that the party executing the affidavit is the owner of the real property described in the affidavit; or

If not the owner of the real property:

A statement that the party executing the affidavit is in possession of the real property under the terms of a lease in recordable form that has a term that continues for at least twenty years after the date of execution of the affidavit; and

The consent of the lessor of the real property endorsed upon or attached to the affidavit and acknowledged or proved in the manner as to entitle a conveyance to be recorded;

The street address and the legal description of the real property to which the manufactured home is or will be permanently affixed;

If the manufactured home is not covered by a certificate of title, a statement by the owner to that effect, and either:

A statement by the owner of the manufactured home that the manufactured home is covered by a manufacturer’s certificate of origin, the date the manufacturer’s certificate of origin was issued, the manufacturer’s serial number, and a statement that annexed to the affidavit of affixation is the original manufacturer’s certificate of origin for the manufactured home, duly endorsed to the owner of the manufactured home, and that the owner of the manufactured home will surrender the manufacturer’s certificate of origin to the department of transportation; or

A statement that the owner of the manufactured home, after diligent search and inquiry, is unable to produce the original manufacturer’s certificate of origin for the manufactured home and that the owner of the manufactured home will apply to the department of transportation for a confirmation of conversion of the manufactured home; or

If the manufactured home is covered by a certificate of title, either:

A statement by the owner of the manufactured home that the manufactured home is covered by a certificate of title, the date the title was issued, the title number, and that the owner of the manufactured home will surrender the title; or

A statement that the owner of the manufactured home, after diligent search and inquiry, is unable to produce the certificate of title for the manufactured home and that the owner of the manufactured home will apply to the department of transportation for a confirmation of conversion of the manufactured home;

A statement whether the manufactured home is subject to one or more security interests or liens and:

If the manufactured home is subject to one or more security interests or liens, the name and address of each party holding a security interest in or lien on the manufactured home, including each holder shown on any certificate of title issued by the department of transportation, the original principal amount secured by each security interest or lien, and a statement that the security interest or lien will be released; or

A statement that each security interest in or lien on the manufactured home, if any, has been released, together with due proof of each release;

If the manufactured home is not covered by a manufacturer’s certificate of origin or a certificate of title, a statement by the owner of the manufactured home to that effect and that the owner of the manufactured home will apply to the department of transportation for a confirmation of conversion of the manufactured home;

A statement that the manufactured home is or will be permanently affixed to the real property;

If the party executing the affidavit acquired the manufactured home before the affixation of the manufactured home to the real property, that party shall complete the statement required by subsection 2 of section 11-18-02.2; and

The name and address of a person designated for filing the recorded copy of the affidavit of affixation with the department of transportation to whom the recorder shall return the recorded copy of the affidavit of affixation after the affidavit has been duly recorded in the real property records as provided in subsection 5.

An affidavit of affixation must be duly acknowledged or proved in like manner as to entitle a conveyance to be recorded, and when so acknowledged or proved and upon payment of the lawful recording fees, the recorder shall immediately cause the affidavit of affixation and any attachments to the affidavit to be duly recorded and indexed under chapter 47-19.

The affidavit of affixation must be accompanied by an applicable fee for recording and issuing a recorded copy of the affidavit.

The act of permanently affixing a manufactured home to real property or the recording of the affidavit of affixation does not impair the rights of a holder of a security interest in or lien on a manufactured home perfected as provided in section 35-01-05.1, unless and until the due filing with and acceptance by the department of transportation of an application to surrender the title as provided in subsection 1 of section 39-05-35 and the release of the security interest or lien as provided in section 39-05-16.1. Upon the filing of a release, the security interest or lien perfected under section 35-01-05.1 is terminated.

The affidavit of affixation must be presented for recording pursuant to chapter 47-19, together with the fees provided by law. Upon receipt from the recorder of a copy of the recorded affidavit of affixation by the person presenting the affidavit for recording, that person shall deliver for filing to the department of transportation the copy of the affidavit of affixation and the other documents as provided in subdivision d of subsection 2.

A manufactured home is deemed to be real property when all of the following events have occurred:

The home is permanently affixed to land as provided in subsection 1;

An affidavit of affixation conforming to the requirements of subsection 3 has been recorded in the conveyance records in the office of the recorder in the county where the manufactured home is permanently affixed;

A copy of the recorded affidavit of affixation has been delivered for filing to the department of transportation as provided in subsection 5; and

The requirements of subsections 1 through 3 of section 39-05-35, as applicable, have been satisfied.

Upon the satisfaction of the requirements of subsection 6, the manufactured home is deemed to be real property; any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, or security interest that can attach to land, buildings erected on the land, or fixtures affixed to the land attach as of the date of its recording in the same manner as if the manufactured home were built from ordinary building materials onsite. Title to the manufactured home must be transferred by deed or other form of conveyance that is effective to transfer an interest in real property, together with the land to which the structure has been affixed. The manufactured home is deemed to be real property and is governed by the laws applicable to real property and the department of transportation has no further authority or jurisdiction over the conveyance or encumbrance of the manufactured home.

Except as provided in subsections 2, 3, 5, 6, and 7, an affidavit of affixation is not necessary or effective to convey or encumber a manufactured home or to change the character of the manufactured home to real property. An agreement by a party to the transaction by which the requirements of this subsection are waived is void as contrary to public policy.

Nothing in this section impairs any rights existing under law before July 1, 2009, of anyone claiming an interest in a manufactured home.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 327, § 12; 2017, ch. 89, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 261, §§ 3, 4, 5, effective August 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 47-10-27 was amended 4 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 89, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1250; and Sections 3, 4, and 5 of Chapter 261, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1219.

47-10-28.
Mobile home park — Ownership — Transfer of ownership — Tenant rights — Penalty.

A person that owns or purchases an existing mobile home park shall:

Obtain an annual license under section 23-10-03;

Designate an official local office, except if the mobile home park contains fewer than twenty-six lots, which must be operational on the fifth business day after the change of ownership;

The mobile home park shall:

Have a designated telephone number manned on weekdays between the hours of eight a.m. and five p.m.;

Have an operational emergency contact number manned at all times;

Designate at least one individual for the property who has the authority to make decisions on behalf of and perform, or direct the performance of, duties imposed on the owner; and

Provide a tenant with the contact information of the individual under paragraph 3;

Provide written notice to a tenant of the mobile home park regarding the change of ownership within five business days after the change of ownership becomes effective. The written notice must include the information required under subdivision c; and

Acknowledge receipt of tenant inquiries or complaints regarding the park, pursuant to section 23-10-10.1, within two business days of receiving the inquiry or complaint.

A person that owns or purchases an existing mobile home park may not require a tenant who owns a mobile home located on the property to sell or transfer ownership of the home to the owner of the mobile home park, except as otherwise provided by law.

A person that owns or purchases an existing mobile home park shall provide a tenant advance written notice of any modifications to park rules or regulations at least thirty days before the date the modifications take effect. Except for the rules and regulations under subsections 4 and 5, upon the effective date of modifications to park rules and regulations, an owner shall provide a tenant who owns a dwelling unit that fails to comply with the park rules and regulations written notice of the failure to comply and provide the tenant three months to remedy the failure or vacate the premises before initiating an action for eviction against the tenant. During the three-month period the tenant shall comply with the park rules and regulations that were in effect before the modifications became effective, including the payment of rent and any other financial obligations under the terms of the lease. During the three-month period, if the tenant provides the owner a signed document from a person in the business of relocating mobile homes declaring it is not possible to relocate the tenant’s dwelling unit within the three-month period, the three-month period must be extended to a date when the dwelling unit can be relocated or the date that is two months after the end of the three-month period, whichever date occurs first.

A person that owns or purchases an existing mobile home park shall provide a tenant advance written notice of any modifications to park rules and regulations addressing sanitation and safety concerns at least thirty days before the date the modifications take effect.

A person that owns or purchases an existing mobile home park shall provide a tenant advance written notice at least thirty days before implementing a rule or regulation regarding the removal of a tongue hitch, or any other modification to the dwelling unit to comply with state or federal housing or financing requirements.

Mobile home park rules in effect on the date advance written notice regarding modifications is provided to a tenant remain in effect until the date the modified rules or regulations take effect.

A person that purchases an existing mobile home park may not increase the monthly tenant rental obligation for six months if the rental amount was increased within the sixty-day period before the date the new owner acquired ownership of the park.

A person that owns or purchases an existing mobile home park may purchase utility services, including water and sewer services on behalf of a tenant, and include the amount in the monthly rental obligation or bill the tenant as a separate charge based on actual usage. An owner may not charge a tenant more than the actual cost per unit amount paid by the landlord to the utility service provider, except for a reasonable administrative fee that may not exceed three dollars. An owner may not charge or back charge for the utility services of a tenant paying for the services as a portion of the tenant’s monthly rental obligation, unless the cost of providing the services increases. If the cost of providing utility services increases, an owner of a mobile home park may charge a tenant a reasonable amount to cover the increased cost of providing the service. The owner shall provide the tenant access to the records of meter readings taken at the mobile home lot of the tenant.

A person that violates a provision of this section is subject to a civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars or actual damages, whichever is less, plus reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 335, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.